Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB62.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 434 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "unauthorized alien" means a person who is unlawfully
present in the United States under the federal Immigration and Nationality Act, 8
U.S.C. sec. 1101 et seq.
(2) A person is guilty of unlawful employment when he or she is unlawfully present
in the United States and knowingly seeks employment or performs work in
exchange for any form of remuneration.
(3) Unlawful employment is a Class A misdemeanor.
Page 1 of 1
BR020100.100 - 201 - XXXX 1/7/2026 8:35 AM Jacketed